Missouri, session 2026, SB1464.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 376.1000 and 376.1017, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 376.1000 and 376.1017, to read as follows:
376.1000. 1. As used in sections 376.1000 to
376.1045, a "multiple employer self-insured health plan" is
any plan or arrangement which is not fully insured and which
is either:
(1) Offered by a staff or employee leasing company; or
(2) Established or maintained for the purpose of
offering or providing health, dental or short-term
disability benefits to employees of two or more employers or
to two or more self-employed individuals and their
dependents.
2. A plan or arrangement is considered fully insured
only if an insurer licensed to transact business in this
state retains the ultimate responsibility for all benefits
payable by a contract or policy of insurance.
376.1017. 1. A plan shall establish loss reserves for
all incurred losses, both reported and unreported, and for
unearned premiums.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1464 2
2. A plan also shall establish a surplus account equal
to the greater of the following:
(1) [Three times the average paid monthly premium
during the plan's most recent fund year;
(2) For plans which do not yet have one fund year's
experience, three times estimated monthly premium; or
(3)] Six hundred thousand dollars; or
(2) An amount equal to two times the authorized
control level risk-based capital.
✓